Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 285B.551 is amended to read:
285B.551. (1) Pursuant to ORS  286A.560 to 286A.585, at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Oregon Business Development
Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds:
(a) To  provide financial and other assistance, including but not limited to loans and grants, to
municipalities,  ports  and other persons and entities in accordance with the laws governing use of
moneys in the Special Public Works Fund created  by ORS 285B.455, the Water Fund created by ORS
285B.563, the Safe Drinking Water Revolving  Loan Fund created by ORS 285A.213, the Oregon Port
Revolving Fund created by ORS 285A.708, the Brownfields Redevelopment Fund created by ORS
285A.188, the Oregon Business  Development Fund created by ORS 285B.092 and the Marine Navi-
gation Improvement Fund created by ORS 777.267.
(b) To fund Oregon’s share of the costs of the Columbia River channel deepening project.
(c) To fund Oregon’s share of the costs of studies and ecosystem  restoration projects in the
lower Columbia River estuary designed to improve habitat for  listed endangered or threatened spe-
cies of Columbia River anadromous salmonids.
(2) The use of lottery bond proceeds is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) The financial and  other assistance to municipalities, ports and other persons and entities
will assist in the establishment and expansion  of businesses in Oregon and in the construction, im-
provement and expansion of infrastructure, community  and port facilities and other facilities that
comprise the physical foundation for industrial and commercial activity and provide the  basic
framework for continued  and expanded economic opportunities and quality communities throughout
Oregon.
(b) The Columbia River channel deepening  project is necessary to allow newer, larger
steamships access to Oregon and Washington deep draft ports. A deeper shipping channel will  allow
the Columbia River to  continue as a world leader in agricultural exports and as a key trade corridor
for farms and businesses throughout Oregon and the region.
(c) Such financial  and other assistance to municipalities, ports and other persons and entities
and the deepening  of the Columbia River channel will therefore promote economic development
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 1
within this state, and thus the use of net proceeds derived from the operation of  the Oregon State
Lottery to pay debt service on lottery bonds  issued under this section to provide such financial and
other assistance to municipalities, ports and other persons and entities and  to pay a portion of the
costs of deepening the Columbia  River channel is an authorized use of state lottery funds under
section 4, Article XV of the Oregon Constitution, and ORS 461.510.
(d) The current lower Columbia River estuary habitat for listed endangered or  threatened spe-
cies  of  Columbia River anadromous salmonids could be improved through ecosystem restoration
projects. The use of the Oregon State Lottery to pay debt service on lottery bonds issued  under this
section to pay  for studying how the estuary could be improved and to pay for ecosystem restoration
projects are authorized uses of state lottery funds.
(3)(a) The aggregate  principal amount of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of
this section for financial and other assistance to municipalities, ports and other  persons and entities
may not  exceed the sum of [ $336,226,252] $366,226,252 and an additional amount estimated by the
State Treasurer to be  necessary to pay bond-related costs. The aggregate principal amount of lottery
bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section for the Columbia River channel  deepening
project may not  exceed the sum of $17.7 million and an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(b) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may not request the  issuance of lottery
bonds under subsection (1)(b) of this section  until the Director of the Oregon Business Development
Department determines  that a final environmental impact statement has been issued and a record
of decisions  has been submitted to Congress by the United States Army Corps of Engineers, Con-
gress has authorized the Columbia River channel deepening project, and  the Washington sponsors’
shares of the costs of the Columbia River channel deepening project have been committed.
(4) The net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(a)  and (b) of this section
shall be deposited in the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund, which is  hereby established in the
State Treasury separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Economic
Infrastructure Project Fund shall be credited  to the fund. All moneys in the Economic Infrastructure
Project  Fund  are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department for
any purpose for which  moneys in the Special Public Works Fund created by ORS 285B.455 may be
used, any  purpose for which moneys in the Water Fund created by ORS 285B.563 may be used, any
purpose for which moneys in the Safe Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund  created by ORS
285A.213 may be used, any purpose for which moneys in  the Oregon Port Revolving Fund created
by ORS 285A.708 may be used, any purpose for which moneys in the Brownfields Redevelopment
Fund created by ORS 285A.188 may be used, any purpose for  which moneys in the Oregon Business
Development Fund created by ORS 285B.092 may be used and any purpose for  which moneys in the
Marine Navigation  Improvement Fund created by ORS 777.267 may be used. The Director of the
Oregon Business Development Department shall allocate the moneys deposited in  the Economic
Infrastructure  Project  Fund for the purposes described in this subsection in accordance with the
priorities developed by the Oregon Business Development Commission in accordance with  ORS
285A.020. However, the director shall  transfer from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund and
deposit into the Channel  Deepening Account of the Marine Navigation Improvement Fund the pro-
ceeds of any lottery bonds sold to finance  a portion of the costs of the Columbia River channel
deepening project. Upon determining the relative  allocation of moneys deposited in the Economic
Infrastructure Project Fund among  the purposes described in this subsection, the director shall
transfer from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund, and deposit into each  of the other funds
described in this subsection, the amounts so allocated. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law
governing the funds described in this  subsection, the funds described in this subsection may be
credited with moneys transferred from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund by the director  in
accordance with this subsection.
(5) The aggregate principal amount of lottery bonds issued  pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this
section for the costs of studies and ecosystem restoration projects in  the lower Columbia River
estuary may not exceed the sum of $750,000 and an additional amount estimated by the  State
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 2
Treasurer  to  be necessary to pay bond-related costs. The net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pur-
suant to subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be  deposited in the Oregon Business, Innovation and
Trade Fund created by ORS 285A.227 and may be  used only for the Oregon nonfederal share of
United States Army Corps of Engineers Columbia  River estuary projects authorized by Congress
prior to August 9, 2001. The director may  not request the issuance of lottery bonds under subsection
(1)(c) of  this section until Congress and Washington have authorized their respective shares of the
costs of the studies and ecosystem restoration projects in the lower Columbia River estuary.
(6) The proceeds of lottery bonds issued  pursuant to this section may be used only for the pur-
poses set forth in this section and for bond-related costs.
SECTION 2. (1) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $5 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the Brownfields Redevelopment
Fund established in ORS 285A.188 for the purposes described in ORS 285A.185 and 285A.188.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Redevelopment of industrial-zoned brownfields improves  the economy by returning
the assessed value of the properties to the real market value for property taxation purposes;
and
(b) The projects made  possible through increased funding to evaluate, clean up and re-
develop brownfields properties create jobs and further economic development.
SECTION 3.
(1) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Water Re-
sources Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $25 million in  net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Water Resources Department for deposit in the  Water Supply Development Account estab-
lished in ORS 541.656, in an amount sufficient to provide:
(a) $15 million in net proceeds to issue grants or loans to evaluate,  plan and develop in-
stream and out-of-stream statewide water development projects.
(b) $10 million in net proceeds to the Deschutes Basin Board of Control to modernize  ir-
rigation delivery systems infrastructure in the Deschutes Basin by piping open canals.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Having adequate drinking water systems, irrigation, drainage and healthy ecosystems
enhances community development and supports Oregon’s economic growth; and
(b) Assisting local governments to  mitigate losses resulting from reduced water supply
for irrigation and retirement of water  rights will enhance community efforts to facilitate and
promote economic growth.
SECTION 4. (1) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Water Re-
sources Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 3
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4 million in net  proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Water Resources Department for deposit in the Water Resources  Department Water Supply
Fund, established in section  10, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009, for distribution to the City
of Newport for environmental permitting, planning and  design costs for replacement of the
Big Creek Dams.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Having adequate drinking water systems, irrigation, drainage and healthy ecosystems
enhances community development and supports Oregon’s economic growth; and
(b) Assisting local governments to mitigate losses resulting  from reduced water supply
for irrigation and retirement of water  rights will enhance community efforts to facilitate and
promote economic growth.
SECTION 5. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at the  request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with the Water Re-
sources Department,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in  an amount that produces $14 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Water Resources Department for deposit in the Water Resources  Department Water Supply
Fund, established in section 10, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009, for distribution  to the
Wallowa Lake Irrigation District for rehabilitation of the Wallowa Lake Dam.
(3) Lottery bonds authorized under this section may not be issued unless:
(a) The Wallowa Lake Irrigation District, State Department of  Fish of Wildlife, Confed-
erated Tribes of the Umatilla Indian Reservation and Nez Perce Tribe enter into  an agree-
ment regarding the protection and release of instream water from  the Wallowa Lake Dam;
and
(b) The Wallowa Lake Irrigation District submits  a copy of the executed agreement to
the Water Resources Department.
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Having adequate drinking water systems, irrigation, drainage and healthy ecosystems
enhances community development and supports Oregon’s economic growth; and
(b) Assisting local governments to mitigate losses resulting  from reduced water supply
for irrigation and retirement of water  rights will enhance community efforts to facilitate and
promote economic growth.
SECTION 6.
 Section 10, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009, as amended  by section 5, chapter 624,
Oregon Laws 2011, and section 14, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  (1) The Water Resources Department Water Supply Fund is established separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys deposited in  the Water Resources De-
partment Water Supply  Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously
appropriated to the Water Resources Department.
(2) The Water Resources Department Water Supply Fund consists of:
(a) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to sections 8 and 9, chapter 906, Oregon  Laws
2009, deposited into the Water  Resources Department Water Supply Fund for the following purposes:
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 4
(A) $2,500,000 for the purposes of issuing grants to  develop Umatilla Basin critical ground water
storage projects described in section 17, chapter 907, Oregon  Laws 2009, and to provide or pay for
services in connection with those projects.
(B) $217,000 to pay for the operation of loan and grant programs under sections 18 to 27, chapter
907, Oregon Laws 2009.
(C) $283,000 for the purpose of developing an integrated state water resources  strategy to im-
plement the state water resources policy pursuant to ORS 536.220 and section 45, chapter  907,
Oregon Laws 2009.
(D) $500,000 for purposes of the grant program established by section 1, chapter 13,  Oregon
Laws 2008.
(b) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to section  4, chapter 624, Oregon Laws 2011,
in an amount sufficient to provide $1,229,052 in  net proceeds and interest earnings for the depart-
ment to finance grants for feasibility studies for water conservation, reuse and storage projects.
(c) $11 million in net proceeds and interest  earnings pursuant to section 13 [ of this 2015 Act ],
chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015,  to develop and implement water storage systems and delivery
infrastructure, implement conservation and reuse projects or provide access to new water supplies.
(d) $750,000 in net proceeds and interest earnings pursuant to section  13 [ of this 2015 Act ],
chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015,  to provide grants for place-based planning.
(e) $1 million in net proceeds and interest earnings pursuant  to section 13 [ of this 2015 Act ],
chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015,  to repair, replace or remediate water wells in the Mosier Creek
area.
(f) $4 million in net proceeds pursuant to section 4 of this 2019 Act for  environmental
permitting, planning and design costs for replacement of the Big Creek Dams.
(g) $14 million in net proceeds pursuant to section  5 of this 2019 Act for rehabilitation
of the Wallowa Lake Dam.
[(f)] (h)  Any other fees, revenues or income deposited in the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 7.  Section 4, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009, as amended by  section 3, chapter 624,
Oregon Laws 2011, section 19, chapter 786,  Oregon Laws 2013, section 15, chapter 121, Oregon Laws
2014, section 37, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, section 4,  chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2016, and
section 7, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) Pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585, at  the request of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Housing and Community Services
Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds for the Housing and Community
Services Department to provide financial assistance to aid in the acquisition, renovation or mainte-
nance of [ section 8 housing or other  housing with federal rent subsidies ] properties with project-
based federal rental assistance contracts, public housing undergoing significant
recapitalization or publicly supported housing as defined in ORS  456.250, or to preserve the
affordability of manufactured dwelling parks .
(2) The use of lottery bond proceeds is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Individuals  who are at risk of homelessness or who otherwise pay a disproportionate share
of income for housing increase their potential  for self-sufficiency, and use proportionately fewer
community-funded resources when they are provided a stable housing environment.
(b) Having housing for at-risk populations is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic growth.
(3) The aggregate principal amount of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)  of this
section may not exceed the amount of [ $58,801,718] $83,801,718 plus an additional amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs as defined in ORS 286A.560.
SECTION 8.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at the  request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Housing and
Community Services Department,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $15 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 5
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Housing and Community Services Department for deposit in  the Housing Acquisition Fund,
established in section 9 of this 2019 Act, to  provide funding for loans to purchasers of na-
turally occurring affordable housing.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Providing financing to  purchasers of naturally occurring affordable housing aids in
prevention of displacement of existing  low and moderate income residents, providing stable
housing to promote self-sufficiency; and
(b) Preserving quality housing to aid in preventing homelessness  is essential to Oregon’s
healthy economic growth.
SECTION 9. (1) The Housing Acquisition Fund is established  in the State Treasury, sep-
arate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Housing Acquisition Fund
must be credited to the fund. The Housing Acquisition Fund consists  of moneys deposited in
the fund under section 8 of this 2019  Act and may include moneys appropriated, allocated,
deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or  otherwise and interest
earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Housing and Community
Services Department for  disbursement for the purposes set forth in section 8 of this 2019
Act.
SECTION 10. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Coast Aquarium, the State Treasurer is authorized to  issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585  in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Oregon Coast Aquarium for  capital improvements
to the Oregon Coast  Aquarium in Newport, including construction of a marine wildlife re-
habilitation and education center.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Providing  financing to enhance the educational resources of the Oregon Coast
Aquarium promotes learning about the coastal environment, sustainable practices and ma-
rine science careers; and
(b) Providing facilities to treat and rehabilitate  stranded and endangered marine wildlife
animals will help to protect aquatic life important to the Oregon coast.
SECTION 11.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Center for
Hope and Safety, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $2.5 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Center for Hope and Safety for construction  of
HOPE Plaza at the site of  the former Greyhound Bus Terminal in Salem, which will include
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 6
space for businesses  that provide job training and services to survivors of domestic violence,
sexual assault, stalking and  human trafficking, as well as transitional and permanent hous-
ing for survivors.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Programs that support  survivors reduce the financial and economic burden domestic
violence imposes on individuals and the community;
(b) Providing services and job training  to survivors increases their workforce partic-
ipation and productivity; and
(c) Having housing for at-risk populations is  essential to Oregon’s healthy economic
growth.
SECTION 12. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the City of
Gresham, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $2 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to  the City of Gresham for expansion of the Gradin
Community Sports Park to include additional fields and amenities.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to sports and recreation services will enhance the economic viability of  the
region, create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 13. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the City of
Roseburg, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS  286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $10 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the City of Roseburg for the Southern Oregon  Medical
Workforce Center project, which will establish a medical training facility in Roseburg.
(3) Lottery bonds authorized under this  section may not be issued until the City of
Roseburg certifies that:
(a) The Southern Oregon Medical Workforce Center project  has successfully completed
the Oregon Solutions process; and
(b) Matching funds in an amount at least equal to the amount of net proceeds of lottery
bonds issued under this section are available to the city for the  purpose described in sub-
section (2) of this section.
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based the  finding that
training the state’s healthcare workforce is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic growth.
SECTION 14.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Curry Health
District, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to  ORS 286A.560
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 7
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $2 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Curry Health District for creation of an emergency
room, including acquisition of emergency services equipment, in the  Curry Medical Center
in Brookings.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
emergency services are necessary components  of a climate that facilitates and encourages
economic development.
SECTION 15.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with the Eugene
Family YMCA, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds  pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $15 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Eugene Family YMCA to construct a new YMCA
facility in Eugene.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to sports and recreation services will enhance the economic viability of  the
region, create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 16.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Hacienda
Community Development Corporation, the State Treasurer is authorized to  issue lottery
bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $2  million in net
proceeds for the purposes described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to  the Hacienda Community Development Corporation for
construction of community spaces in the Las Adelitas housing project.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
creation of community spaces will  accommodate youth and family services, economic op-
portunity services and small business development services, which facilitate  and encourage
economic development.
SECTION 17. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with Jefferson
County, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4.1 million in net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this  section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 8
under ORS 461.553 for distribution  to Jefferson County for construction of the Jefferson
County Health and Wellness Center,  including associated utility, transit and parking
infrastructure.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
expanding access to health care for all members of the workforce will promote economic
development.
SECTION 18.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with Multnomah
County School District No. 7, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue lottery bonds pur-
suant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $2,331,872 in net proceeds for
the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to Multnomah County School  District No. 7 for con-
struction of a school-based health center at Reynolds High  School in Troutdale. The project
also includes renovation of existing classroom space to establish a temporary health center
that will be restored upon completion of the permanent health center.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Funding construction of public school facilities finances public education; and
(b) Student access to  healthcare services improves educational outcomes and attainment.
SECTION 19.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with Parrott Creek
Child and Family Services,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant
to ORS  286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3.5 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to  Parrott Creek Child and Family Services to update and
renovate buildings using trauma-informed designs to  better serve high-need children and
teens in the juvenile and child welfare systems.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
expanding programs  and services for at-risk youth will facilitate and encourage economic
development.
SECTION 20. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Port of
Cascade Locks, the State Treasurer is authorized to  issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $2.4 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Port of Cascade  Locks to construct buildings and
upgrade and expand infrastructure in the Port of Cascade Locks Business Park.
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 9
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
assisting in  the establishment and expansion of businesses in Oregon and in the con-
struction, improvement and expansion of infrastructure  that comprises the physical foun-
dation for industrial and commercial  activities provide the basic framework for continued
and expanded economic opportunities and quality communities.
SECTION 21. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Port of
Morrow, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $1.4 million in net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Port of Morrow for expansion of the Early Learning
Center at the Port of Morrow.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) More Oregonians will attend workforce training if  early education options are avail-
able for their children. Greater numbers of Oregonians  who are trained in workforce skills
will lead to enhanced economic development.
(b) Early education is a necessary component  of a climate that facilitates and encourages
economic development.
SECTION 22.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with Umatilla County,
the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $1.6 million in net  proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553  for distribution to Umatilla County for renovation and expansion of the
Umatilla County Jail to provide space for mental health care services.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
public safety facilities  and services are necessary components of a climate that facilitates
and encourages economic development.
SECTION 23. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Wallowa
Valley Center for Wellness, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant
to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $2.5 million in net proceeds for  the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Wallowa  Valley Center for Wellness to build an
integrated health services facility in Enterprise.
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 10
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
expanding access to health  and mental health care for all members of the workforce will
promote economic development.
SECTION 24. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the YMCA of
Columbia-Willamette, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585  in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution  to the YMCA of Columbia-Willamette to purchase the
Beaverton Hoop YMCA property, which encompasses approximately five acres and two
buildings. The project also includes repurposing the second building  to accommodate addition
of a Child Development Center and YMCA office space.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to sports and recreation services will enhance the economic viability of  the
region, create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 25.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the Higher Ed-
ucation Coordinating Commission,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560  to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $6.5 million in net pro-
ceeds for the purposes described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission for deposit in the  Facility for Agricultural Re-
source Management Fund, established in section 26 of this  2019 Act, to provide a grant to
the Blue Mountain Community College to design and construct a new facility for  animal
science programs, including veterinary technician,  livestock breeding and equine health
management.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Providing financing to build a community college agricultural  education building ex-
pands opportunities for hands-on learning; and
(b) Having facilities to prepare students for agricultural careers helps to support
Oregon’s rural agricultural economy.
SECTION 26. (1) The Facility for Agricultural Resource Management  Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the
Facility for Agricultural Resource Management Fund  must be credited to the fund. The Fa-
cility for Agricultural Resource Management  Fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund
under section 25 of this 2019 Act  and may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited
or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and interest  earned on
moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission for disbursement for the purposes set forth in  section 25 of this 2019 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 11
SECTION 27. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $1.88 million in net pro-
ceeds for the purposes described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the OBDD  Economic Development
Distributions Fund established under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distrib-
ution to the City of Mill City for storm drainage system improvements.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
stormwater systems are an integral part of  the commercial and industrial infrastructure of
this state, and improvements to  stormwater systems will promote economic development in
this state.
SECTION 28. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $20 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the OBDD  Economic Development
Distributions Fund established under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distrib-
ution to the City of Salem for drinking water system improvements.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
drinking water systems are an integral part of the commercial and  industrial infrastructure
of this state,  and improvements to drinking water systems will promote economic develop-
ment in this state.
SECTION 29. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $7 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Business Development  Department for deposit in the OBDD Economic Development
Distributions Fund established under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017,  for distrib-
ution to the City of Sweet Home for rehabilitating  the Sweet Home Wastewater Treatment
Plant.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
wastewater treatment systems  are an integral part of the commercial and industrial
infrastructure of this state, and improvement of a wastewater treatment plant will promote
economic development.
SECTION 30.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 12
pursuant to ORS 286A.560  to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $7.8 million in net pro-
ceeds for the purposes described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Business Development  Department for deposit in the OBDD Economic Development
Distributions Fund established under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017,  for distrib-
ution to  the Confederated Tribes of the Warm Springs Reservation of Oregon for improve-
ments to the Warm Springs Wastewater Treatment Plant, installation of water meters and
improvements to the water distribution system.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
water and wastewater treatment  systems are an integral part of the commercial and indus-
trial infrastructure  of this state, and improvements to water and wastewater treatment
systems will promote economic development.
SECTION 31.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560  to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $1.7 million in net pro-
ceeds for the purposes described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the OBDD  Economic Development
Distributions Fund established under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distrib-
ution to the City of Hood River for  replacement of the Hood River waterfront storm water
line.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
stormwater systems are an integral part of  the commercial and industrial infrastructure of
this state and improvements to storm water systems will promote economic development  in
this state.
SECTION 32.  Section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 28.  (1) The OBDD Economic Development Distributions  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys in the OBDD
Economic Development Distributions Fund  must be credited to the fund. The  OBDD Economic
Development Distributions Fund  consists of moneys deposited in the fund under sections 26 and
27 [of this 2017 Act ], chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017,  and sections 27 to 31 of this 2019 Act  and
may include fees, revenues or other income deposited into the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for purposes described in sections 26 and 27 [ of this 2017 Act ], chapter 748, Oregon Laws
2017, and sections 27 to 31 of this 2019 Act .
SECTION 33.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $15 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the Levee  Project Grant Fund es-
tablished under section 34 of this 2019 Act for the purpose  of providing grants under ORS
285B.420 for levee projects as defined in ORS 285B.410.
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 13
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Levees are an integral part of the commercial and  industrial infrastructure of this
state.
(b) The inspection, accreditation, certification and repair of levees  will promote economic
development within this state.
SECTION 34. (1) The  Levee Project Grant Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the Levee Project Grant
Fund must be credited to the fund.  The Levee Project Grant Fund consists of moneys de-
posited in the fund under section 33 of this 2019 Act and may include moneys appropriated,
allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly  or otherwise and
interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department for the Oregon Infrastructure Finance  Authority to provide grants under
ORS 285B.420 for levee projects as defined in ORS 285B.410.
(3) Grants from the fund for planning projects are limited  to a maximum of $2 million
per applicant per biennium.
(4) Grants from the fund for construction or  capital improvement projects may not ex-
ceed an amount equal to 80 percent of the total cost of the project.
(5) A grant may not  be awarded from the fund unless the applicant pledges matching
funds to the project of at least 20 percent of the amount of the grant.
SECTION 35.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $3 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the Cultural Resources Economic
Fund established in section 6, chapter  786, Oregon Laws 2013, to provide the following grants:
(a) $1.5 million to the Beaverton Arts  Foundation for construction of the Patricia Reser
Center for the Arts.
(b) $1.5 million to the Lincoln City Cultural Center  for development and renovation of the
center’s cultural plaza and exterior grounds.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) The grants described in this section will leverage art and cultural resources to create
vibrant public spaces that integrate art and cultural and natural amenities, sustain  Oregon’s
rich arts and cultural experiences and enhance  a strong sense of place and community
identity.
(b) The factors described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection have the effect of creating
jobs, expanding business and tax  revenues and enhancing the economic vitality of Oregon
communities.
SECTION 36.
 Section 6, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, as  amended by section 27, chapter 812,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 23, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The Cultural Resources Economic  Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys  in the Cultural Resources Eco-
nomic Fund shall be  credited to the fund. The Cultural Resources Economic Fund consists of moneys
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 14
deposited in the  fund under section 5, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, [ and] section 26, chapter 812,
Oregon Laws 2015, [ and] section 22  [of this 2017 Act ], chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, and section
35 of this 2019 Act  and  may include fees, revenues or other income deposited in the fund by the
Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Oregon Business Development
Department for disbursement for the purposes set forth in section 5,  chapter 786, Oregon Laws
2013, and section 26,  chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, [ and] section 22 [ of this 2017 Act ], chapter
748, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 35 of this 2019 Act .
SECTION 37. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the Department
of Transportation, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $2 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of Transportation for deposit in the DOT  Economic Development Distributions
Fund established in ORS 461.557 for distribution to the City of Sherwood for  pedestrian con-
nection improvements between Sherwood East and West at or near the  State Highway 99W
and Sunset Boulevard intersection.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
a safe, efficient and reliable  pedestrian and bicycle transportation network supports the
long-term economic development and livability of this state.
SECTION 38. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the Department
of Transportation, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of Transportation for deposit in the DOT  Economic Development Distributions
Fund established in ORS 461.557 for distribution to the Oregon International Port  of Coos
Bay for  repair and replacement of bridge structures along the Coos Bay rail link, as defined
in ORS 777.915.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improvements in  multimodal transportation systems are necessary to facilitate the flow of
goods and services to national and international markets through the deep water port at
Coos Bay.
SECTION 39.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585  in an amount that produces $4 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of  Veterans’ Affairs for deposit in the Veterans’ Affordable Housing Fund, es-
tablished in section 40 of this 2019 Act, for distribution to  the YMCA of Marion and Polk
Counties to construct veterans’ affordable housing in Salem.
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 15
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Having housing for at-risk populations  is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic
growth.
(b) A severe shortage of affordable housing exists in  Oregon, and market indicators
demonstrate a growing gap between the supply of and the demand for affordable housing.
SECTION 40. (1) The Veterans’ Affordable Housing Fund is established in  the State
Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Veterans’
Affordable Housing Fund must be credited to the fund.  The Veterans’ Affordable Housing
Fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund under section 39 of this 2019  Act and may
include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by  the Legisla-
tive Assembly or otherwise and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Veterans’
Affairs for disbursement for the purposes set forth in section 39 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 41. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the State Parks
and Recreation Department, the State Treasurer may issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
State Parks and Recreation Department for deposit into the Oregon  Main Street
Revitalization Grant Program Fund established in ORS  390.264 to provide grants pursuant
to ORS 390.262.
(3) The  Legislative Assembly finds that the use of proceeds of lottery bonds issued pur-
suant to this section will create jobs,  further economic development and enhance the eco-
nomic vitality of Oregon downtowns and local communities  by supporting projects that
revitalize historic downtown commercial districts, redevelop  and reuse existing buildings,
facilitate small business relocation and expansion initiatives and  provide assistance, training
and technical services.
SECTION 42. Section 13, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, as  amended by section 1, chapter 900,
Oregon Laws 2009,  section 1, chapter 754, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 3, chapter 815, Oregon
Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  (1) In addition  to amounts authorized under ORS 286.505 to 286.545 (2005 Edition) or
pursuant to ORS 286A.035, the State Treasurer, at the request of the Director  of the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department, may issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585:
(a) In an amount of up to $60 million for payment of the expenses of the Coos Bay  Channel
Project in increments described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) In  an additional amount to be estimated by the State Treasurer for payment of bond-related
costs of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the Oregon Business  Development De-
partment and the State Treasurer.
(2) The director  shall request that the State Treasurer issue the amount of bonds described in
subsection (1)(a) of this section in increments that allow the director, at the request of the  primary
sponsor, to transfer:
(a) In the biennium beginning July 1, 2007, up to $5 million  in net proceeds of lottery bonds to
the Coos Bay Channel Fund established in section 15, chapter 746,  Oregon Laws 2007, for distrib-
ution to  the primary sponsor after the director finds that the primary sponsor has taken action
pursuant to the grant agreement  required in section 14, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, that trig-
gers the distribution of bond proceeds described in this paragraph.
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 16
(b) In the  biennium beginning July 1, [ 2017] 2019, up to $15 million in net proceeds of lottery
bonds, minus any other state funds secured by  the primary sponsor in the interim period 2015 to
2016, to the Coos  Bay Channel Fund established in section 15, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, for
distribution to the primary sponsor after the director finds that the primary sponsor  has taken
action pursuant to the grant agreement  required in section 14, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, that
triggers the distribution of bond proceeds described in this paragraph.
(c) In the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, up to $40 million in net proceeds of  lottery
bonds to the Coos Bay Channel Fund established in section 15, chapter 746, Oregon Laws  2007, for
distribution to the primary sponsor after the director finds that the primary sponsor  has taken
action pursuant to the grant agreement  required in section 14, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, that
triggers the distribution of bond proceeds described in this paragraph.
SECTION 43. Section 14, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, as  amended by section 2, chapter 900,
Oregon Laws 2009, section 2, chapter 754, Oregon  Laws 2013, section 4, chapter 815, Oregon Laws
2015, and section 14, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 14.  (1) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department shall enter into one
or more grant agreements with the primary sponsor that require the Oregon Business  Development
Department to disburse, over the course of the project, an  aggregate principal amount of $60 million
for payment of the expenses of the Coos  Bay Channel Project, in the increments described in section
13 (2), chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, from the Coos Bay  Channel Fund established pursuant to
section 15, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, to the primary sponsor. The department shall make dis-
bursements from the fund as soon as bond proceeds are deposited in the fund.
(2) The one or more grant agreements must, subject to subsection (3)  of this section, establish
appropriate triggers for the incremental biennial distribution  of bond proceeds described in section
13 (2), chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, based on  appropriate measures of progress in completion of
the project that are satisfactory  to the director and consistent with prudent financial practices that
reflect sound stewardship of public resources.
(3)(a) Prior  to the distribution of the bond proceeds described in section 13 (2)(b), chapter 746,
Oregon Laws 2007, the primary sponsor shall provide  to the director a budget document outlining
expenditures  for  the Coos Bay Channel Project and shall verify and certify to the director that the
primary sponsor has prepared and submitted to the United States Army Corps of  Engineers the
tentatively selected plan report identifying the preferred alternative for the project.
(b) Prior to the distribution of the bond proceeds  described in section 13 (2)(c), chapter 746,
Oregon Laws 2007, the primary sponsor shall provide  to the director a budget document outlining
expenditures for the Coos Bay Channel Project and verify and certify to the director that:
(A) The final environmental impact statement and the draft record  of decision have been issued
in accordance with the National Environmental Policy Act (42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq.);
(B) The Oregon International Port of Coos Bay has prepared and submitted to  the United States
Army Corps of Engineers  a draft combined report pursuant to section 204 of the Water Resources
Development Act of 1986 (P.L. 99-662) and  section 14 of the Rivers and Harbors Appropriation Act
of 1899 (33 U.S.C. 408) for technical agency review;
(C) The [ Director of Civil  Works ] Commander, Northwestern Division,  for the United States
Army Corps of Engineers has approved the project pursuant to section  14 of the Rivers and Harbors
Appropriation Act of 1899;
(D) The United States Army Corps of Engineers Portland District has  issued permits for con-
struction pursuant to section 404  of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (P.L. 92-500), as
amended, and section 10 of the Rivers and Harbors Appropriation Act of 1899; and
(E) The Assistant Secretary of the Army (Civil Works)  for the United States Army Corps of
Engineers has approved and  executed an agreement pursuant to section 204(f) of the Water Re-
sources Development Act of 1986.
(4) The State of Oregon and its agencies and departments are not  liable to the lenders, vendors
or contractors of the Oregon sponsors for any action or omission under sections 11  to 15, chapter
746, Oregon Laws 2007.
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 17
(5) By  receipt of any part of net proceeds of lottery bonds described in section 13, chapter 746,
Oregon Laws 2007,  the primary sponsor agrees to indemnify the state and its agencies and depart-
ments to the fullest extent permitted by law for liability the state or its agencies  and departments
might incur in connection with any borrowing by the primary sponsor for the project.
(6) The director  and the primary sponsor shall modify the existing grant agreement as may be
necessary to incorporate the amendments to this section and section  13, chapter 746, Oregon Laws
2007, by sections 1 and 2, chapter 754, Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 44. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House June 26, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 18